Utah statutes.
62A-3-208.   Prohibited acts -- Penalty.

(1)  No person may:

(a)  give or cause to be given advance notice to a long-term care facility or agency that an investigation or inspection under the direction of the ombudsman is pending or under consideration, except as provided by law;

(b)  disclose confidential information submitted to the ombudsman pursuant to this part, except as provided by law;

(c)  willfully interfere with the lawful actions of the ombudsman;

(d)  willfully refuse to comply with lawful demands of the ombudsman, including the demand for immediate entry into or inspection of the premises of any long-term care facility or agency or for immediate access to any elderly resident of a long-term care facility; or

(e)  offer or accept any compensation, gratuity, or promise thereof in an effort to affect the outcome of a matter being investigated or of a matter which is before the ombudsman for determination of whether an investigation should be conducted.

(2)  Violation of any provision of this part constitutes a class B misdemeanor.

